Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.410

Training to support discipline policies under chapter 28A.600 RCW.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, shall develop a training program to support the implementation of discipline policies and procedures under chapter 28A.600 RCW.

(2) School districts are strongly encouraged to provide the trainings to all school and district staff interacting with students, including instructional staff and noninstructional staff, as well as within a reasonable time following any substantive change to school discipline policies or procedures.

(3) To the maximum extent feasible, the trainings must incorporate or adapt existing online training or curriculum, including securing materials or curriculum under contract or purchase agreements within available funds.

(4) The trainings must be developed in modules that allow:

(a) Access to material over a reasonable number of training sessions;

(b) Delivery in person or online; and

(c) Use in a self-directed manner.

[ 2016 c 72 s 104.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.